Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.030

Authorization and compliance with chapter required.

An alien bank shall not establish and operate an office or bureau in this state unless it is authorized to do so by the director and unless it first complies with all of the provisions of this chapter and then only to the extent expressly permitted by this chapter.

[ 1994 c 92 s 81; 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 3. Formerly RCW 30.42.030.]